Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 30.6 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the Opioid Lawsuit Settlement Fund (Fund 383) of the State Treasury,
the sum of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to be budgeted
and expended in accordance with law.
Req. No. 13722 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 30.6 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the Opioid Lawsuit Settlement Fund (Fund 383) of the State Treasury,
the sum of One Million Two Hundred Fifty-three Thousand Six Hundred
Fifty-eight Dollars ($1,253,658.00) to be distributed to non-
litigating subdivisions.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-13722 JM 05/16/25








Req. No. 13722 Page 2